Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-918
Strategic plan; contents; report; appear at hearing.

(1) For each biennium, the Department of Correctional Services shall, as part of the appropriations request process pursuant to subsection (1) of section 81-132, include a strategic plan that identifies the main purpose or purposes of each program, verifiable and auditable key goals that the department believes are fair measures of its progress in meeting each program's main purpose or purposes, and benchmarks for improving performance on the key goals. The department shall also report whether the benchmarks are being met and, if not, the expected timeframes for meeting them.

(2) On or before July 1 of each year, the Department of Correctional Services shall report electronically to the Judiciary Committee of the Legislature and the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature on the progress towards the key goals identified pursuant to this section that occurred in the previous twelve months. Upon request, the department shall appear at a joint hearing of the Judiciary Committee and Appropriations Committee and present the report.

Laws 2015, LB33, § 3;

Laws 2016, LB1092, § 11;

Laws 2023, LB157, § 17;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 42.
July 18, 2026